Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,107
Tax-exempt motor vehicles; distinctive plates.

The department may provide distinctive license plates issued for use on motor vehicles which are tax exempt pursuant to subdivision (6) of section 60-3,185. License plates on such motor vehicles shall display, in addition to the license number, the words tax exempt.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 107;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 38.